Utah statutes.
63M-1-205.   Interface with Public Service Commission.

(1)  The director or the director's designee shall:

(a)  become generally informed of significant rate cases and policy proceedings before the Public Service Commission; and

(b)  monitor and study the potential economic development impact of these proceedings before the Public Service Commission.

(2)  In the discretion of the director or the director's designee, the office may appear in any proceeding before the Public Service Commission to testify, advise, or present argument regarding the economic development impact of any matter that is the subject of the proceeding.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

